Florida, session 2026, HB359.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb359 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 359, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature

Section 1. Subsection (6) is added to section 933.02,
Florida Statutes, to read:
933.02 Grounds for issuance of search warrant.—Upon proper
affidavits being made, a search warrant may be issued under the
provisions of this chapter upon any of the following grounds:
(6) To recover a deceased body.

This section also applies to any papers or documents used as a
means of or in aid of the commission of any offense against the
laws of the state.
Section 2. Section 933.05, Florida Statutes, is amended to
read:
933.05 Issuance and return of search warrants; issuance in
blank prohibited.—
(1) A search warrant cannot be issued except upon probable
cause supported by affidavit or affidavits, naming or describing
the person, place, or thing to be searched and particularly
describing the property or thing to be seized.; A no search
warrant may not shall be issued in blank.,
(2) A search and any such warrant must shall be returned
within 10 days after issuance, not including the date of
issuance thereof, except that a search warrant issued:
(a) To an out-of-state provider for electronic
communications data as described in s. 934.23 must be returned
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb359 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 359, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
within 20 days.
(b) To search for and seize specimens from a specific
person for DNA analysis and comparison, including blood and
saliva samples, or to seize specimens pursuant to s. 943.325 for
entry into the DNA database must be returned within 30 days.
(c) For a computer, a computer system, or an electronic
device, and any data or information contained in such computer,
computer system, or electronic device as those terms are defined
in s. 815.03, must be returned within 365 days that is in the
actual possession of a law enforcement agency at the time such
warrant is issued shall be returned to the court within 45 days
after issuance thereof.
(3) If a search warrant is issued to search for and seize
a computer, a computer system, or an electronic device, and any
data or information contained in such computer, computer system,
or electronic device, such warrant is considered timely executed
if the computer, computer system, or electronic device was
seized by a law enforcement agency within 10 days of the
issuance of the search warrant, not including the date of
issuance.
(4) This section does not require a law enforcement agency
to complete the analysis or review of data or information
contained in a computer, computer system, or electronic device
within the period provided in subsection (2) if such computer,
computer system, or electronic device was timely seized by a law
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb359 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 359, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
enforcement agency under subsection (3).
(5) For purposes of this section, the terms "computer,"
"computer system," and "electronic device" have the same meaning
as in s. 815.03.
Section 3. Subsection (5) is added to section 933.07,
Florida Statutes, and subsection (1) of that section is
republished, to read:
933.07 Issuance of search warrants.—
(1) The judge, upon examination of the application and
proofs submitted, if satisfied that probable cause exists for
the issuing of the search warrant, shall thereupon issue a
search warrant signed by him or her with his or her name of
office, to any sheriff and the sheriff's deputies or any police
officer or other person authorized by law to execute process,
commanding the officer or person forthwith to search the
property described in the warrant or the person named, for the
property specified, and to bring the property and any person
arrested in connection therewith before the judge or some other
court having jurisdiction of the offense.
(5) A judge may authorize a law enforcement officer
applying for a search warrant under subsection (1) to appear
remotely using audio-video communication technology. As used in
this section, the term "audio-video communication technology"
has the same meaning as in s. 117.201.
100 Section 4. Section 934.025, Florida Statutes, is created
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb359 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 359, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
101 to read:
102 934.025 Search warrants and court orders; remote
103 appearance authorized.—A judge may authorize a law enforcement
104 officer applying for a search warrant or court order pursuant to
105 this chapter to appear remotely using audio-video communication
106 technology. As used in this section, the term "audio-video
107 communication technology" has the same meaning as in s. 117.201.
108 Section 5. Paragraph (b) of subsection (4) of section
109 934.50, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
110 934.50 Searches and seizure using a drone.—
111 (4) EXCEPTIONS.—This section does not prohibit the use of
112 a drone:
113 (b) If the law enforcement agency first obtains a search
114 warrant signed by a judge authorizing the use of a drone,
115 including, but not limited to, a search warrant authorizing a
116 law enforcement agency to search an area or areas where evidence
117 that a crime was committed might reasonably be found.
118 Section 6. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb359 -02-er